Hawaii statutes.
[§386-3.5] Negotiation for benefit
coverage. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any
employer may determine the benefits and coverage of a policy required under
this chapter through collective bargaining with an appropriate bargaining unit;
provided that the bargained agreement shall be reviewed by the director to
ensure that the agreement does not provide benefits and coverage less than
those provided in this chapter. The director shall approve the agreement
within ninety days after submittal upon a finding that the agreement provides
the benefits and coverage required. This section shall not apply to collective
bargaining contracts negotiated pursuant to chapter 89. The director may adopt
rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this section.

(b) This section shall apply only to
collective bargaining agreements negotiated subsequent to June 29, 1995. [L
1995, c 234, §1]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as an addition to part II, but was codified
to this part pursuant to §23G-15.

"June 29, 1995" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next